Illinois, session 104th, HB1044.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Unified Code of Corrections is amended by 5changing Section 5-4-3 as follows: 6    (730 ILCS 5/5-4-3)  (from Ch. 38, par. 1005-4-3)7    Sec. 5-4-3. Specimens; genetic marker groups. 8    (a) Any person convicted of, found guilty under the 9Juvenile Court Act of 1987 for, or who received a disposition 10of court supervision for a qualifying offense or attempt of a 11qualifying offense, convicted or found guilty of any offense 12classified as a felony under Illinois law, convicted or found 13guilty of any offense requiring registration under the Sex 14Offender Registration Act, found guilty or given supervision 15for any offense classified as a felony under the Juvenile 16Court Act of 1987, convicted or found guilty of, under the 17Juvenile Court Act of 1987, any offense requiring registration 18under the Sex Offender Registration Act, institutionalized as 19a sexually dangerous person under the Sexually Dangerous 20Persons Act, or committed as a sexually violent person under 21the Sexually Violent Persons Commitment Act shall, regardless 22of the sentence or disposition imposed, be required to submit 23specimens of blood, saliva, or tissue to the Illinois State   HB1044- 2 -LRB104 03264 RLC 13286 b1Police in accordance with the provisions of this Section, 2provided such person is:3        (1) convicted of a qualifying offense or attempt of a 4    qualifying offense on or after July 1, 1990 and sentenced 5    to a term of imprisonment, periodic imprisonment, fine, 6    probation, conditional discharge or any other form of 7    sentence, or given a disposition of court supervision for 8    the offense;9        (1.5) found guilty or given supervision under the 10    Juvenile Court Act of 1987 for a qualifying offense or 11    attempt of a qualifying offense on or after January 1, 12    1997;13        (2) ordered institutionalized as a sexually dangerous 14    person on or after July 1, 1990;15        (3) convicted of a qualifying offense or attempt of a 16    qualifying offense before July 1, 1990 and is presently 17    confined as a result of such conviction in any State 18    correctional facility or county jail or is presently 19    serving a sentence of probation, conditional discharge or 20    periodic imprisonment as a result of such conviction;21        (3.5) convicted or found guilty of any offense 22    classified as a felony under Illinois law or found guilty 23    or given supervision for such an offense under the 24    Juvenile Court Act of 1987 on or after August 22, 2002;25        (4) presently institutionalized as a sexually 26    dangerous person or presently institutionalized as a   HB1044- 3 -LRB104 03264 RLC 13286 b1    person found guilty but mentally ill of a sexual offense 2    or attempt to commit a sexual offense; or3        (4.5) ordered committed as a sexually violent person 4    on or after January 1, 1998 (the effective date of the 5    Sexually Violent Persons Commitment Act).6    (a-1) Any person incarcerated in a facility of the 7Illinois Department of Corrections or the Illinois Department 8of Juvenile Justice on or after August 22, 2002, whether for a 9term of years or natural life, who has not yet submitted a 10specimen of blood, saliva, or tissue shall be required to 11submit a specimen of blood, saliva, or tissue prior to his or 12her final discharge, or release on parole, aftercare release, 13or mandatory supervised release, as a condition of his or her 14parole, aftercare release, or mandatory supervised release, or 15within 6 months from August 13, 2009 (the effective date of 16Public Act 96-426), whichever is sooner. A person incarcerated 17on or after August 13, 2009 (the effective date of Public Act 1896-426) shall be required to submit a specimen within 45 days 19of incarceration, or prior to his or her final discharge, or 20release on parole, aftercare release, or mandatory supervised 21release, as a condition of his or her parole, aftercare 22release, or mandatory supervised release, whichever is sooner. 23These specimens shall be placed into the State or national DNA 24database, to be used in accordance with other provisions of 25this Section, by the Illinois State Police.26    (a-2) Any person sentenced to life imprisonment in a   HB1044- 4 -LRB104 03264 RLC 13286 b1facility of the Illinois Department of Corrections after June 213, 2005 (the effective date of Public Act 94-16) shall be 3required to provide a specimen of blood, saliva, or tissue 4within 45 days after sentencing or disposition at a collection 5site designated by the Illinois State Police. Any person 6serving a sentence of life imprisonment in a facility of the 7Illinois Department of Corrections on June 13, 2005 (the 8effective date of Public Act 94-16) or any person who is under 9a sentence of death on June 13, 2005 (the effective date of 10Public Act 94-16) shall be required to provide a specimen of 11blood, saliva, or tissue upon request at a collection site 12designated by the Illinois State Police. 13    (a-3) Any person seeking transfer to or residency in 14Illinois under Sections 3-3-11.05 through 3-3-11.5 of this 15Code, the Interstate Compact for Adult Offender Supervision, 16or the Interstate Agreements on Sexually Dangerous Persons Act 17shall be required to provide a specimen of blood, saliva, or 18tissue within 45 days after transfer to or residency in 19Illinois at a collection site designated by the Illinois State 20Police. 21    (a-3.1) Any person required by an order of the court to 22submit a DNA specimen shall be required to provide a specimen 23of blood, saliva, or tissue within 45 days after the court 24order at a collection site designated by the Illinois State 25Police.26    (a-3.2) Any On or after January 1, 2012 (the effective   HB1044- 5 -LRB104 03264 RLC 13286 b1date of Public Act 97-383), any person arrested for any of the 2following offenses, after an indictment has been returned by a 3grand jury, or following a hearing pursuant to Section 109-3 4of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 and a judge finds 5there is probable cause to believe the arrestee has committed 6one of the designated offenses, or an arrestee has waived a 7preliminary hearing shall be required to provide a specimen of 8blood, saliva, or tissue within 14 days after such arrest 9indictment or hearing at a collection site designated by the 10Illinois State Police:11        (A) first degree murder;12        (B) home invasion;13        (C) predatory criminal sexual assault of a child;14        (D) aggravated criminal sexual assault; or15        (E) criminal sexual assault.16    In addition, on and after the effective date of this 17amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, any person 18arrested for any of the following offenses shall be required 19to provide a specimen of blood, saliva, or tissue within 14 20days after such arrest at a collection site designated by the 21Illinois State Police:22        (1) a forcible felony as defined in Section 2-8 of the 23    Criminal Code of 2012; or24        (2) felony domestic battery.25    (a-3.3) Any person required to register as a sex offender 26under the Sex Offender Registration Act, regardless of the   HB1044- 6 -LRB104 03264 RLC 13286 b1date of conviction as set forth in subsection (c-5.2) shall be 2required to provide a specimen of blood, saliva, or tissue 3within the time period prescribed in subsection (c-5.2) at a 4collection site designated by the Illinois State Police. 5    (a-5) Any person who was otherwise convicted of or 6received a disposition of court supervision for any other 7offense under the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 82012 or who was found guilty or given supervision for such a 9violation under the Juvenile Court Act of 1987, may, 10regardless of the sentence imposed, be required by an order of 11the court to submit specimens of blood, saliva, or tissue to 12the Illinois State Police in accordance with the provisions of 13this Section.14    (b) Any person required by paragraphs (a)(1), (a)(1.5), 15(a)(2), (a)(3.5), and (a-5) to provide specimens of blood, 16saliva, or tissue shall provide specimens of blood, saliva, or 17tissue within 45 days after sentencing or disposition at a 18collection site designated by the Illinois State Police.19    (c) Any person required by paragraphs (a)(3), (a)(4), and 20(a)(4.5) to provide specimens of blood, saliva, or tissue 21shall be required to provide such specimens prior to final 22discharge or within 6 months from August 13, 2009 (the 23effective date of Public Act 96-426), whichever is sooner. 24These specimens shall be placed into the State or national DNA 25database, to be used in accordance with other provisions of 26this Act, by the Illinois State Police.  HB1044- 7 -LRB104 03264 RLC 13286 b1    (c-5) Any person required by paragraph (a-3) to provide 2specimens of blood, saliva, or tissue shall, where feasible, 3be required to provide the specimens before being accepted for 4conditioned residency in Illinois under the interstate compact 5or agreement, but no later than 45 days after arrival in this 6State.7    (c-5.2) Unless it is determined that a registered sex 8offender has previously submitted a specimen of blood, saliva, 9or tissue that has been placed into the State DNA database, a 10person registering as a sex offender shall be required to 11submit a specimen at the time of his or her initial 12registration pursuant to the Sex Offender Registration Act or, 13for a person registered as a sex offender on or prior to 14January 1, 2012 (the effective date of Public Act 97-383), 15within one year of January 1, 2012 (the effective date of 16Public Act 97-383) or at the time of his or her next required 17registration. 18    (c-6) The Illinois State Police may determine which type 19of specimen or specimens, blood, saliva, or tissue, is 20acceptable for submission to the Division of Forensic Services 21for analysis. The Illinois State Police may require the 22submission of fingerprints from anyone required to give a 23specimen under this Act.24    (d) The Illinois State Police shall provide all equipment 25and instructions necessary for the collection of blood 26specimens. The collection of specimens shall be performed in a   HB1044- 8 -LRB104 03264 RLC 13286 b1medically approved manner. Only a physician authorized to 2practice medicine, a registered nurse or other qualified 3person trained in venipuncture may withdraw blood for the 4purposes of this Act. The specimens shall thereafter be 5forwarded to the Illinois State Police, Division of Forensic 6Services, for analysis and categorizing into genetic marker 7groupings.8    (d-1) The Illinois State Police shall provide all 9equipment and instructions necessary for the collection of 10saliva specimens. The collection of saliva specimens shall be 11performed in a medically approved manner. Only a person 12trained in the instructions promulgated by the Illinois State 13Police on collecting saliva may collect saliva for the 14purposes of this Section. The specimens shall thereafter be 15forwarded to the Illinois State Police, Division of Forensic 16Services, for analysis and categorizing into genetic marker 17groupings.18    (d-2) The Illinois State Police shall provide all 19equipment and instructions necessary for the collection of 20tissue specimens. The collection of tissue specimens shall be 21performed in a medically approved manner. Only a person 22trained in the instructions promulgated by the Illinois State 23Police on collecting tissue may collect tissue for the 24purposes of this Section. The specimens shall thereafter be 25forwarded to the Illinois State Police, Division of Forensic 26Services, for analysis and categorizing into genetic marker   HB1044- 9 -LRB104 03264 RLC 13286 b1groupings.2    (d-5) To the extent that funds are available, the Illinois 3State Police shall contract with qualified personnel and 4certified laboratories for the collection, analysis, and 5categorization of known specimens, except as provided in 6subsection (n) of this Section.7    (d-6) Agencies designated by the Illinois State Police and 8the Illinois State Police may contract with third parties to 9provide for the collection or analysis of DNA, or both, of an 10offender's blood, saliva, and tissue specimens, except as 11provided in subsection (n) of this Section.12    (e) The genetic marker groupings shall be maintained by 13the Illinois State Police, Division of Forensic Services.14    (f) The genetic marker grouping analysis information 15obtained pursuant to this Act shall be confidential and shall 16be released only to peace officers of the United States, of 17other states or territories, of the insular possessions of the 18United States, of foreign countries duly authorized to receive 19the same, to all peace officers of the State of Illinois and to 20all prosecutorial agencies, and to defense counsel as provided 21by Section 116-5 of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963. The 22genetic marker grouping analysis information obtained pursuant 23to this Act shall be used only for (i) valid law enforcement 24identification purposes and as required by the Federal Bureau 25of Investigation for participation in the National DNA 26database, (ii) technology validation purposes, (iii) a   HB1044- 10 -LRB104 03264 RLC 13286 b1population statistics database, (iv) quality assurance 2purposes if personally identifying information is removed, (v) 3assisting in the defense of the criminally accused pursuant to 4Section 116-5 of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963, or 5(vi) identifying and assisting in the prosecution of a person 6who is suspected of committing a sexual assault as defined in 7Section 1a of the Sexual Assault Survivors Emergency Treatment 8Act. Notwithstanding any other statutory provision to the 9contrary, all information obtained under this Section shall be 10maintained in a single State data base, which may be uploaded 11into a national database, and which information may be subject 12to expungement only as set forth in subsection (f-1).13    (f-1) Upon receipt of notification of a reversal of a 14conviction based on actual innocence, or of the granting of a 15pardon pursuant to Section 12 of Article V of the Illinois 16Constitution, if that pardon document specifically states that 17the reason for the pardon is the actual innocence of an 18individual whose DNA record has been stored in the State or 19national DNA identification index in accordance with this 20Section by the Illinois State Police, the DNA record shall be 21expunged from the DNA identification index, and the Department 22shall by rule prescribe procedures to ensure that the record 23and any specimens, analyses, or other documents relating to 24such record, whether in the possession of the Department or 25any law enforcement or police agency, or any forensic DNA 26laboratory, including any duplicates or copies thereof, are   HB1044- 11 -LRB104 03264 RLC 13286 b1destroyed and a letter is sent to the court verifying the 2expungement is completed. For specimens required to be 3collected prior to conviction, unless the individual has other 4charges or convictions that require submission of a specimen, 5the DNA record for an individual shall be expunged from the DNA 6identification databases and the specimen destroyed upon 7receipt of a certified copy of a final court order for each 8charge against an individual in which the charge has been 9dismissed, resulted in acquittal, or that the charge was not 10filed within the applicable time period. The Department shall 11by rule prescribe procedures to ensure that the record and any 12specimens in the possession or control of the Department are 13destroyed and a letter is sent to the court verifying the 14expungement is completed.15    (f-5) Any person who intentionally uses genetic marker 16grouping analysis information, or any other information 17derived from a DNA specimen, beyond the authorized uses as 18provided under this Section, or any other Illinois law, is 19guilty of a Class 4 felony and shall be subject to a fine of 20not less than $5,000.21    (f-6) The Illinois State Police may contract with third 22parties for the purposes of implementing Public Act 93-216, 23except as provided in subsection (n) of this Section. Any 24other party contracting to carry out the functions of this 25Section shall be subject to the same restrictions and 26requirements of this Section insofar as applicable, as the   HB1044- 12 -LRB104 03264 RLC 13286 b1Illinois State Police, and to any additional restrictions 2imposed by the Illinois State Police.3    (g) For the purposes of this Section, "qualifying offense" 4means any of the following:5        (1) any violation or inchoate violation of Section 6    11-1.50, 11-1.60, 11-6, 11-9.1, 11-11, 11-18.1, 12-15, or 7    12-16 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 8    2012;9        (1.1) any violation or inchoate violation of Section 10    9-1, 9-2, 10-1, 10-2, 12-11, 12-11.1, 18-1, 18-2, 18-3, 11    18-4, 18-6, 19-1, 19-2, or 19-6 of the Criminal Code of 12    1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012 for which persons are 13    convicted on or after July 1, 2001;14        (2) any former statute of this State which defined a 15    felony sexual offense;16        (3) (blank);17        (4) any inchoate violation of Section 9-3.1, 9-3.4, 18    11-9.3, 12-7.3, or 12-7.4 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or 19    the Criminal Code of 2012; or20        (5) any violation or inchoate violation of Article 29D 21    of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012.22    (g-5) (Blank).23    (h) The Illinois State Police shall be the State central 24repository for all genetic marker grouping analysis 25information obtained pursuant to this Act. The Illinois State 26Police may promulgate rules for the form and manner of the   HB1044- 13 -LRB104 03264 RLC 13286 b1collection of blood, saliva, or tissue specimens and other 2procedures for the operation of this Act. The provisions of 3the Administrative Review Law shall apply to all actions taken 4under the rules so promulgated.5    (i)(1) A person required to provide a blood, saliva, or 6tissue specimen shall cooperate with the collection of the 7specimen and any deliberate act by that person intended to 8impede, delay or stop the collection of the blood, saliva, or 9tissue specimen is a Class 4 felony.10    (2) In the event that a person's DNA specimen is not 11adequate for any reason, the person shall provide another DNA 12specimen for analysis. Duly authorized law enforcement and 13corrections personnel may employ reasonable force in cases in 14which an individual refuses to provide a DNA specimen required 15under this Act.16    (j) (Blank).17    (k) All analysis and categorization assessments provided 18under the Criminal and Traffic Assessment Act to the State 19Crime Laboratory Fund shall be regulated as follows:20        (1) (Blank).21        (2) (Blank).22        (3) Moneys deposited into the State Crime Laboratory 23    Fund shall be used by Illinois State Police crime 24    laboratories as designated by the Director of the Illinois 25    State Police. These funds shall be in addition to any 26    allocations made pursuant to existing laws and shall be   HB1044- 14 -LRB104 03264 RLC 13286 b1    designated for the exclusive use of State crime 2    laboratories. These uses may include, but are not limited 3    to, the following:4            (A) Costs incurred in providing analysis and 5        genetic marker categorization as required by 6        subsection (d).7            (B) Costs incurred in maintaining genetic marker 8        groupings as required by subsection (e).9            (C) Costs incurred in the purchase and maintenance 10        of equipment for use in performing analyses.11            (D) Costs incurred in continuing research and 12        development of new techniques for analysis and genetic 13        marker categorization.14            (E) Costs incurred in continuing education, 15        training, and professional development of forensic 16        scientists regularly employed by these laboratories.17    (l) The failure of a person to provide a specimen, or of 18any person or agency to collect a specimen, shall in no way 19alter the obligation of the person to submit such specimen, or 20the authority of the Illinois State Police or persons 21designated by the Illinois State Police to collect the 22specimen, or the authority of the Illinois State Police to 23accept, analyze and maintain the specimen or to maintain or 24upload results of genetic marker grouping analysis information 25into a State or national database.26    (m) If any provision of Public Act 93-216 is held   HB1044- 15 -LRB104 03264 RLC 13286 b1unconstitutional or otherwise invalid, the remainder of Public 2Act 93-216 is not affected.3    (n) Neither the Illinois State Police, the Division of 4Forensic Services, nor any laboratory of the Division of 5Forensic Services may contract out forensic testing for the 6purpose of an active investigation or a matter pending before 7a court of competent jurisdiction without the written consent 8of the prosecuting agency. For the purposes of this subsection 9(n), "forensic testing" includes the analysis of physical 10evidence in an investigation or other proceeding for the 11prosecution of a violation of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the 12Criminal Code of 2012 or for matters adjudicated under the 13Juvenile Court Act of 1987 and includes the use of forensic 14databases and databanks, including DNA, firearm, and 15fingerprint databases, and expert testimony.16    (o) Mistake does not invalidate a database match. The 17detention, arrest, or conviction of a person based upon a 18database match or database information is not invalidated if 19it is determined that the specimen was obtained or placed in 20the database by mistake. 21    (p) This Section may be referred to as the Illinois DNA 22Database Law of 2011. 23(Source: P.A. 102-505, eff. 8-20-21; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 24103-51, eff. 1-1-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24.)